Utah statutes.
75-2-201.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Decedent's nonprobate transfers to others," as used in sections other
than Section 75-2-205, means the amounts that are included in the augmented
estate under Section 75-2-205.
(2)  "Fractional interest in property held in joint tenancy with the right of
survivorship," whether the fractional interest is unilaterally severable or
not, means the fraction, the numerator of which is one and the denominator of
which, if the decedent was a joint tenant, is one plus the number of joint
tenants who survive the decedent and which, if the decedent was not a joint
tenant, is the number of joint tenants.
(3)  "Marriage," as it relates to a transfer by the decedent during marriage,
means any marriage of the decedent to the decedent's surviving spouse.
(4)  "Nonadverse party" means a person who does not have a substantial
beneficial interest in the trust or other property arrangement that would be
adversely affected by the exercise or nonexercise of the power that the person
possesses respecting the trust or other property arrangement.  A person having
a general power of appointment over property is considered to have a
beneficial interest in the property.
(5)  "Power" or "power of appointment" includes a power to designate the
beneficiary of a beneficiary designation.
(6)  "Presently exercisable general power of appointment" means a power of
appointment under which, at the time in question, the decedent, whether or not
the decedent then had the capacity to exercise the power, held a power to
create a present or future interest in himself, his creditors, his estate, or
creditors of his estate, and includes a power to revoke or invade the
principal of a trust or other property arrangement.
(7)  "Probate estate" means property that would pass by intestate succession
if the decedent died without a valid will.
(8)  "Property" includes values subject to a beneficiary designation.
(9)  "Right to income" includes a right to payments under a commercial or
private annuity, an annuity trust, a unitrust, or a similar arrangement.
(10)  "Transfer," as it relates to a transfer by or of the decedent, includes:
(a)  an exercise or release of a presently exercisable general power of
appointment held by the decedent;
(b)  a lapse at death of a presently exercisable general power of appointment
held by the decedent; and
(c)  an exercise, release, or lapse of a general power of appointment that the
decedent created in himself and of a power described in Subsection
75-2-205(2)(b) that the decedent conferred on a nonadverse party.
